pt-PT: Disciplina de tiro aos pratos: FITASC; Five stand; Multidisciplinar; Skeet; Sporting clays; Prática de tiro; Fosso; Outro
th: ประเภทกีฬายิงเป้าบิน: FITASC; ไฟว์สแตนด์; หลายประเภท; สกีต; สปอร์ตติงเคลย์; ฝึกซ้อมยิงเป้า; แทรป; อื่นๆ
pl: Dyscyplina strzelectwa do rzutków: FITASC; Five stand; Wielodyscyplinarna; Skeet; Sporting; Strzelanie do celu / trening; Trap; Inna
sv: Lerskyttedisciplin: FITASC; Five stand; Flera grenar; Skeet; Sporting; Målskytte; Trap; Annan
pt-BR: Modalidade de tiro ao prato: FITASC; Five stand; Multidisciplinar; Skeet; Sporting clays; Prática de tiro ao alvo; Fossa olímpica; Outro
zh-CN: 飞碟射击项目: FITASC; 五向飞碟; 多项目; 双向飞碟; 运动飞碟; 射击练习; 多向飞碟; 其他
sk-SK: Disciplína streľby na hlinené terče: FITASC; Five stand; Multidisciplinárne; Skeet; Lovecký parkúr; Streľba na terč; Trap; Iné
en: Clay shooting discipline: FITASC; Five stand; Multi-discipline; Skeet; Sporting clays; Target practice; Trap; Other
ko: 클레이 사격 종목: FITASC; 파이브 스탠드; 다분야; 스키트; 스포팅 클레이; 표적 사격 연습; 트랩; 기타
hr-HR: Disciplina gađanja glinenih lopti: FITASC; Five stand; Više disciplina; Skeet; Sporting clays; Vježbanje gađanja; Trap; Ostalo
ro-RO: Disciplina de tir sportiv: FITASC; Five stand; Multidisciplinar; Skeet; Sporting clays; Tir la țintă; Trap; Altele
nl: Kleiduivenschieten discipline: FITASC; Five stand; Multidisciplinair; Skeet; Sporting clays; Doelschieten; Trap; Anders
it: disciplina del tiro al piattello: FITASC; Five stand; Multidisciplina; Skeet; Percorso di caccia; Tiro al bersaglio; Trap; Altro
lt-LT: Molinių taikinių šaudymo disciplina: FITASC; „Five stand“; Daugiadisciplininė; Apvali aikštelė (Skeet); Sportingas; Šaudymas į taikinius; Tranšėjinė aikštelė (Trap); Kita
es: Disciplina de tiro al plato: FITASC; Five stand; Multidisciplinario; Skeet; Sporting clays; Práctica de tiro al blanco; Trap; Otro
ru: Дисциплина стендовой стрельбы: FITASC; Пятиместный стенд (Five stand); Многоборье; Скит; Спортинг; Стрельба по мишеням; Трап; Другое
tr: Kil atış disiplini: FITASC; Beşli stand; Çoklu disiplin; Skeet; Sporting kil atışı; Hedef çalışması; Trap; Diğer
da: Lerdueskydnings-disciplin: FITASC; Five stand; Multidisciplin; Skeet; Sporting clays; Målskydning; Trap; Andet
bg-BG: Дисциплина в стрелба по летящи мишени: FITASC; Five stand; Многодисциплинарна; Скийт; Спортинг; Стрелба по мишени; Трап; Друго
hu: Koronglövészet szakág: FITASC; Five stand; Többféle ágazat; Skeet; Vadászkorong; Céllövészet; Trap; Egyéb
zh-TW: 飛靶射擊項目: FITASC; 五個靶位 (Five stand); 多項射擊; 定向飛靶; 運動飛靶; 標靶練習; 不定向飛靶; 其他
sl-SI: Disciplina streljanja glinastih tarč: FITASC; Five stand; Več disciplin; Skeet; Športni glinasti golobi; Vaja streljanja na tarčo; Trap; Drugo
fi: Savikiekkojen ammuntalaji: FITASC; Five stand; Monilaji; Skeet; Sporting; Maaliammunta; Trap; Muu
de: Disziplin des Tontaubenschießens: FITASC; Five Stand; Multi-Disziplin; Skeet; Jagdparcours; Zielübung; Trap; Sonstige
vi: Môn bắn súng đất sét: FITASC; Bắn 5 bệ; Đa môn; Bắn đĩa bay (Skeet); Bắn đĩa thể thao; Thực hành ngắm bắn; Bắn đĩa ném (Trap); Khác
el: Αγωνιστική σκοποβολή με πήλινους στόχους: FITASC; Five stand; Πολλαπλών αθλημάτων; Σκιτ (Skeet); Sporting clays; Πρακτική σκοποβολή; Τραπ (Trap); Άλλο
nb: Leirskytingsdisiplin: FITASC; Five stand; Flerdisiplin; Skeet; Sporting clays; Målskyting; Trap; Annen
cs: Disciplína sportovní střelby na asfaltové holuby: FITASC; Five stand; Více disciplín; Skeet; Lovecký parkúr; Cvičná střelba na terč; Trap; Jiné
fr: Discipline de tir aux plateaux: FITASC; Five stand; Multidiscipline; Skeet; Parcours de chasse; Tir sur cible; Fosse; Autre
ja: クレー射撃競技: FITASC; ファイブスタンド; マルチ種目; スキート; スポーティングクレー; 標的射撃; トラップ; その他